Maryland, session 2025, HB1052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–207.
(a) (1) A nonstock corporation may consolidate or merge only with another
nonstock corporation.
(2) A Maryland nonstock corporation may convert only into [a]:
(I) A foreign corporation that does not have the authority to issue
stock; OR
(II) A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE UNDER
SUBTITLE 6D OF THIS TITLE.
(3) A foreign corporation that does not have the authority to issue stock:
(i) May convert into a Maryland nonstock corporation; and
(ii) May not convert into [a]:
1. A Maryland corporation that has the authority to issue
stock; OR
2. A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE UNDER
SUBTITLE 6D OF THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 6D. LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVES.

HOUSE BILL 1052 3
5–6D–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION” MEANS THE CHARTER BY WHICH A
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE BECOMES INCORPORATED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE.
(C) “BYLAWS” MEANS THE DOCUMENT THAT DETAILS AND GOVERNS THE
INTERNAL ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE.
(D) “CONVERSION” MEANS THE TRANSITION OF A PROPERTY FROM A
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL FACILITY TO A PROPERTY OWNED BY A LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE FOR USE BY MEMBERS OF THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE.
(E) “COOPERATIVE INTEREST” MEANS THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN A
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE THAT IS COUPLED WITH A POSSESSORY
INTEREST IN REAL OR PERSONAL PROPERTY OWNED BY THE LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE AND EVIDENCED BY A MEMBERSHIP CERTIFICATE.
(F) “COOPERATIVE PROJECT” MEANS ALL THE REAL AND PERSONAL
PROPERTY IN THIS STATE THAT IS OWNED OR LEASED BY A LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE FOR THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF RESIDENTIAL USE.
(G) “DISABLED PERSON” MEANS A PERSON WITH A MEASURABLE
LIMITATION OF MOBILITY DUE TO CONGENITAL DEFECT, DISEASE, OR TRAUMA.
(H) “LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE” MEANS A MARYLAND
NONSTOCK CORPORATION QUALIFIED IN THIS STATE, HAVING ONLY ONE CLASS OF
MEMBERSHIP, IN WHICH EACH MEMBER, BY VIRTUE OF THE MEMBER’S
MEMBERSHIP, HAS A COOPERATIVE INTEREST IN THE CORPORATION.
(I) “LOW–INCOME HOUSEHOLD” MEANS A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN INCOME
THAT DOES NOT EXCEED 80% OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME FOR A HOUSEHOLD OF
THE SAME SIZE.
(J) “MEMBER” MEANS A PERSON WHO OWNS A COOPERATIVE INTEREST.
(K) “MEMBERSHIP CERTIFICATE” MEANS:

HOUSE BILL 1052
(1) A DOCUMENT ISSUED BY A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE EVIDENCING OWNERSHIP OF A COOPERATIVE INTEREST; OR
(2) IF THERE IS NO DOCUMENT THAT SATISFIES ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PROPRIETARY LEASE.
(L) “MOVING EXPENSES” MEANS COSTS INCURRED TO:
(1) HIRE CONTRACTORS, LABOR, TRUCKS, OR EQUIPMENT FOR THE
TRANSPORTATION OF PERSONAL PROPERTY;
(2) PACK AND UNPACK PERSONAL PROPERTY;
(3) DISCONNECT AND INSTALL PERSONAL PROPERTY;
(4) INSURE PERSONAL PROPERTY TO BE MOVED; AND
(5) DISCONNECT AND RECONNECT UTILITIES SUCH AS TELEPHONE
SERVICE, GAS, WATER, AND ELECTRICITY.
(M) (1) “PROPRIETARY LEASE” MEANS AN AGREEMENT WITH THE
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE UNDER WHICH A MEMBER HAS AN
EXCLUSIVE POSSESSORY INTEREST IN A UNIT AND A POSSESSORY INTEREST IN
COMMON WITH OTHER MEMBERS IN THAT PORTION OF A COOPERATIVE PROJECT
NOT CONSTITUTING UNITS AND THAT CREATES A LEGAL RELATIONSHIP OF
LANDLORD AND TENANT BETWEEN THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE
AND THE MEMBER, RESPECTIVELY.
(2) “PROPRIETARY LEASE” INCLUDES, IF THERE IS NO OTHER
DOCUMENT THAT SATISFIES PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A MEMBERSHIP
CERTIFICATE.
(N) “RESIDENTIAL RENTAL FACILITY” MEANS PROPERTY CONTAINING AT
LEAST FIVE DWELLING UNITS LEASED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES.
(O) “SENIOR CITIZEN” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS AT LEAST 62 YEARS OLD.
(P) “UNIT” MEANS A PORTION OF THE COOPERATIVE PROJECT LEASED FOR
EXCLUSIVE OCCUPANCY BY A MEMBER UNDER A PROPRIETARY LEASE.
5–6D–02.

HOUSE BILL 1052 5
A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION MAY BE ORGANIZED FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONVERTING TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE AFTER
ACQUIRING OWNERSHIP OF A RESIDENTIAL RENTAL FACILITY.
5–6D–03.
(A) ON ACQUIRING A RESIDENTIAL RENTAL FACILITY, A MARYLAND
NONSTOCK CORPORATION MAY ADOPT A RESOLUTION TO APPLY FOR CONVERSION
TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE.
(B) THE RESOLUTION TO APPLY FOR CONVERSION TO A LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE MAY BE APPROVED BY AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A
MAJORITY OF:
(1) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK
CORPORATION; OR
(2) THE TOTAL MEMBERS OF THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK
CORPORATION.
(C) NOTICE OF THE OUTCOME OF A VOTE ON A RESOLUTION UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED TO EACH MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK
CORPORATION.
(D) A VOTE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION.
5–6D–04.
(A) FOLLOWING AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE TO APPLY FOR CONVERSION TO A
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE, A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION
SHALL PREPARE AND SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS
AND INFORMATION FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE:
(1) ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NAME AND LOCATION OF THE LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE;
(II) A STATEMENT OF THE PURPOSES OF THE LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1052
(III) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE MEMBERS OF THE
MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION;
(2) A DISCLOSURE STATEMENT, INCLUDING:
(I) THE DATE ON WHICH THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE TO APPLY
FOR CONVERSION TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING CORPORATION TOOK PLACE;
(II) A STATEMENT OF THE FORM OF OWNERSHIP OF ALL REAL
AND PERSONAL PROPERTY THAT IS INTENDED TO BE OWNED OR LEASED BY THE
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE;
(III) A STATEMENT OF THE PROJECTED COMPLETION DATES
FOR ANY PROPOSED IMPROVEMENTS;
(IV) A STATEMENT OF THE PROJECTED DATE OF FORMATION
FOR THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE;
(V) A DESCRIPTION OF THE VOTING AND OTHER RIGHTS IN THE
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE;
(VI) A STATEMENT OF ANY FEES REQUIRED BY THE LIMITED
EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE IN CONNECTION WITH THE TRANSFER OF
MEMBERSHIP OR ISSUANCE OF A PROPRIETARY LEASE;
(VII) A STATEMENT OF THE KNOWN OR ANTICIPATED COMMON
CHARGES THAT MAY BE IMPOSED ON MEMBERS;
(VIII) A STATEMENT OF THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST ASSOCIATED
WITH EACH UNIT AND THE UNDERLYING DEBT RESPONSIBILITY ASSOCIATED WITH
EACH UNIT ON A PRO RATA BASIS, IF APPLICABLE;
(IX) A STATEMENT AS TO WHETHER THE LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE HAS OR WILL OBTAIN INSURANCE COVERAGE FOR
CASUALTY, PROPERTY DAMAGE, AND PUBLIC LIABILITY AND IN WHAT AMOUNTS;
(X) A STATEMENT OF ALL WARRANTIES AND DISCLAIMERS
MADE DURING THE PURCHASE OF THE RESIDENTIAL RENTAL FACILITY BY THE
MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION; AND
(XI) COPIES OF THE PROPOSED OR FINAL:

HOUSE BILL 1052 7
1. CONTRACT OF SALE FOR THE RESIDENTIAL RENTAL
FACILITY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE REAL PROPERTY OF THE LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE;
2. MEMBERSHIP CERTIFICATE;
3. PROPRIETARY LEASE;
4. RULES, IF ANY;
5. LEASE, OTHER THAN THE PROPRIETARY LEASE, TO A
THIRD PARTY OF REAL OR PERSONAL PROPERTY TO WHICH THE LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE IS A PARTY; AND
6. IF APPLICABLE, NOTICE TO AFFECTED HOUSEHOLDS
THAT MAY BE REQUIRED UNDER § 5–6D–06 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) AN ANNUAL OPERATING BUDGET, INCLUDING INSURANCE,
MAINTENANCE, RESERVES, AND GENERAL EXPENSES;
(4) BYLAWS;
(5) A SHARE AGREEMENT; AND
(6) ANY OTHER DOCUMENTS OR INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) STATEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE SUMMARIZED OR
PRODUCED IN A COLLECTION OF DOCUMENTS THAT EFFECTIVELY CONVEYS THE
REQUIRED INFORMATION.
(C) (1) (I) A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION SHALL FILE THE
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION
WITH THE DEPARTMENT NOT LATER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE
UNDER § 5–6D–03 THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY GRANT AN EXTENSION OF THE
DEADLINE ESTABLISHED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE
MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION DEMONSTRATES A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO
PREPARE THE DOCUMENTS.
(2) (I) A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION MAY SUBMIT A
REQUEST TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A FULL OR PARTIAL WAIVER OF THE

HOUSE BILL 1052
REQUIREMENT OF A DISCLOSURE STATEMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY GRANT A FULL OR PARTIAL WAIVER
OF ONE OR MORE OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IF THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION MAKES GOOD FAITH EFFORTS TO
SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS.
(D) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF DOCUMENTS AND INFORMATION
PROVIDED BY A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) CONDITIONALLY ACCEPT THE DOCUMENTS FOR RECORD
SUBJECT TO AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE BY THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION
TO CONVERT TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE; OR
(2) IF THE DOCUMENTS AND INFORMATION DO NOT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION AND ANY ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT, DENY THE DOCUMENTS FOR RECORD AND
NOTIFY THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION OF THE BASIS FOR THE DENIAL.
5–6D–05.
(A) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT CONDITIONALLY ACCEPTS A SUBMISSION
UNDER § 5–6D–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION
SHALL:
(I) PROMPTLY NOTIFY EACH MEMBER OF THE ACCEPTANCE BY
THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) HOLD A VOTE TO CONVERT TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER PROVIDING NOTICE.
(2) NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) INFORM THE MEMBERS THAT AN ELECTION TO CONVERT
THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE WILL BE HELD NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER DELIVERY OF THE
NOTICE; AND
(II) INCLUDE A COPY OF THE DOCUMENTS CONDITIONALLY
ACCEPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1052 9
(B) (1) A VOTE TO CONVERT FROM A MARYLAND NONSTOCK
CORPORATION TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE SHALL REQUIRE AN
AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF AT LEAST TWO–THIRDS OF THE TOTAL MEMBERS.
(2) A VOTE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK
CORPORATION.
(C) (1) IF AT LEAST TWO–THIRDS OF THE TOTAL MEMBERS OF THE
MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION VOTE TO CONVERT TO A LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE, THE MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION SHALL:
(I) NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) BE CONVERTED TO AND RECOGNIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT
AS A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE.
(2) IF A VOTE TO CONVERT TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FAILS, THE MARYLAND
NONSTOCK CORPORATION MAY NOT ATTEMPT TO CONVERT TO A LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE FOR AT LEAST 12 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE OF THE FAILED
VOTE.
(D) ONCE A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION IS CONVERTED TO A
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE, VOTES SHALL BE ASSIGNED SO THAT
EACH UNIT HAS ONE VOTE.
5–6D–06.
(A) IF A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION VOTES TO CONVERT TO A
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE, THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE CONVERSION TO ANY
HOUSEHOLD THAT WILL BE REQUIRED TO VACATE A PORTION OF THE RESIDENTIAL
RENTAL FACILITY USED AS A RESIDENCE BY THE HOUSEHOLD.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION, A
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE MAY REQUIRE A HOUSEHOLD TO VACATE
NOT EARLIER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF NOTICE DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A
HOUSEHOLD MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO VACATE A UNIT EARLIER THAN 12 MONTHS

HOUSE BILL 1052
FOLLOWING THE RECEIPT OF NOTICE TO VACATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IF, ON THE DATE THAT THE NOTICE IS GIVEN:
(1) A MEMBER OF THE HOUSEHOLD IS A DISABLED PERSON OR A
SENIOR CITIZEN WHO HAS BEEN A MEMBER OF THE HOUSEHOLD FOR AT LEAST 12
MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE TO VACATE; AND
(2) THE HOUSEHOLD:
(I) IS A LOW–INCOME HOUSEHOLD;
(II) NOTIFIES THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE OF
THE INTENT TO REMAIN IN THE UNIT FOR A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 90 DAYS; AND
(III) SUBMITS THE NOTICE UNDER ITEM (II) OF THIS ITEM TO
THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING
THE NOTICE TO VACATE.
(D) A HOUSEHOLD MAY BE REQUIRED TO VACATE THE PREMISES BEFORE
THE EXPIRATION OF ANY MINIMUM TIME PERIOD UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE
HOUSEHOLD:
(1) BREACHES A COVENANT IN THE LEASE OCCURRING BEFORE OR
AFTER THE NOTICE TO VACATE IS GIVEN; OR
(2) FAILS TO PAY RENT BEFORE OR AFTER THE NOTICE TO VACATE IS
GIVEN.
(E) A LOW–INCOME HOUSEHOLD THAT IS REQUIRED TO VACATE A UNIT
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE FOR MOVING EXPENSES THAT:
(1) ARE ACTUALLY AND REASONABLY INCURRED; AND
(2) ARE AT LEAST $375 BUT LESS THAN $751.
5–6D–07.
(A) THE APPRECIATION AND RESALE OF A COOPERATIVE INTEREST MAY
NOT EXCEED THE COST PAID BY THE MEMBER FOR THE INITIAL COOPERATIVE
INTEREST, ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION PLUS THE COST OF IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
COOPERATIVE INTEREST MADE BY THE MEMBER THAT WERE APPROVED BY THE
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE.

HOUSE BILL 1052 11
(B) A COOPERATIVE INTEREST MAY BE SOLD ONLY TO A LOW–INCOME
HOUSEHOLD.
5–6D–08.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT MAY:
(1) TO THE EXTENT APPLICABLE TO AND NOT INCONSISTENT WITH
THIS SUBTITLE, USING A STANDARDIZED METHODOLOGY, ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL
RIGHTS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE AND
ITS MEMBERS BASED ON AN INDIVIDUALIZED ASSESSMENT OF THE COOPERATIVE;
(2) BASE A DETERMINATION UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
ON THE RIGHTS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATIONS
AND THEIR MEMBERS UNDER SUBTITLE 6B OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) ESTABLISH A PROGRAM TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO MARYLAND
NONSTOCK CORPORATIONS TO PROMOTE THE ESTABLISHMENT OF LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVES.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
5–6D–09.
(A) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT IMPOSE RESTRICTIONS ON A
LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE.
(B) THE PROHIBITION IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES
REQUIREMENTS THROUGH LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE THAT RESTRICT THE SALE OF
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL FACILITIES TO A MARYLAND NONSTOCK CORPORATION THAT
PLANS TO CONVERT TO A LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE.
5–6D–10.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE AND ENSURE THE EFFECTIVE FUNCTIONING OF LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – Property

HOUSE BILL 1052
7–308.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, PROPERTY IS NOT
SUBJECT TO STATE PROPERTY TAX IF THE PROPERTY IS OWNED BY A LIMITED
EQUITY HOUSING COOPERATIVE THAT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 6D OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(B) THE EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES
ONLY FOR THE FIRST 5 TAXABLE YEARS THAT THE LIMITED EQUITY HOUSING
COOPERATIVE OWNS THE PROPERTY.
9–275.
(A) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY GRANT, BY LAW,
A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON REAL PROPERTY OWNED BY A LIMITED EQUITY
HOUSING COOPERATIVE THAT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 6D OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR:
(1) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION;
(2) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION;
(3) REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND
UNIFORM PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE TAX CREDIT; AND
(4) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect June 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30,
2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.